Mississippi, session 20251E, SB2015.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The following sum of money, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, to defray the expenses of the Department of Public Safety for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026................................ $ 168,604,209.00. SECTION 2.  The following sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated out of any money in the State Treasury to the credit of the Department of Public Safety for the purpose of defraying the expenses incurred in the operation of the various divisions of the department for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026................................ $   117,126,547.00. SECTION 3.  Of the funds appropriated under the provisions of this act, not more than the following amount of funds, with the exception of the provisions in this section, shall be expended only for Personal Services, which includes Vacancy Funding, for the following authorized number of employment headcount: FUNDING: General Funds:              $ 130,570,571.00 Special Funds:              $  24,121,389.00 Total Funds:                $ 154,691,960.00 PERSONAL SERVICES: Employee Salaries, Wages, and Fringe Benefits:           $ 153,986,960.00 Progressions:               $ 0.00 Vacancy Funding:            $     705,000.00 Total Personal Services:     $ 154,691,960.00 AUTHORIZED HEADCOUNT: Permanent:                   1,698 Time-Limited: 74 As used in this section, the term Personal Services shall mean funds provided under the major object of expenditure category Personal Services for Salaries, Wages, and Fringe Benefits.  Funds in this category shall not be transferred to any other category. It is the intention of the Legislature to ensure compliance with the Variable Compensation Plan, as outlined in Section 25-9-147, Mississippi Code of 1972. Payment from these funds shall be in accordance with the Variable Compensation Plan promulgated by the Mississippi State Personnel Board. It is the Legislatures intention that no employees salary falls below the minimum salary established by the Mississippi State Personnel Board. The State Personnel Board shall determine and publish the projected annual cost of Personal Services based on monthly and year-to-date payroll expenditures in compliance with the provisions of this act. With the funds herein appropriated, it shall be the agencys responsibility to ensure that no single personnel action or combination of personnel actions, when annualized, exceeds the Fiscal Year 2026 appropriation for Personal Services with the exception of escalated funds. Further, it shall be the agencys responsibility to ensure that funds required to be appropriated for Personal Services for Fiscal Year 2027 do not exceed Fiscal Year 2026 funds appropriated for that purpose unless programs or positions are added to the agencys Fiscal Year 2026 budget by the Mississippi Legislature. If, at the time the agency takes any action to change Personal Services, the State Personnel Board determines that the agency has taken or will take an action that would cause the agency to exceed the funds appropriated in this act when annualized for Fiscal Year 2026 or increase the need for Personal Services for Fiscal Year 2027, when annualized, the State Personnel Board shall process no salary actions until such time as the requirements of the provisions of this section are met with the exception of new hires determined to be essential for the agency. When used in this section, Vacancy Funding shall mean funds included in the Total Personal Services amount listed above and designated for approved vacancies in Fiscal Year 2026. These funds are to be utilized to increase the number of filled headcounts that were authorized but unfilled as of the last day of Fiscal Year 2025. If the agency fills additional headcounts after May 1, 2025, until the end of Fiscal Year 2025, the amount of available Vacancy Funding may be proportionally reduced to reflect the updated number of filled headcounts. The agency shall be responsible for ensuring that Vacancy Funding is used to increase headcounts and not for promotions, title changes, in-range salary adjustments, or any other mechanism for increasing salaries for current employees. Any transfers or escalations shall be made in accordance with the terms, conditions, and procedures established by law or allowable under the terms set forth within this act. The State Personnel Board shall not escalate positions without written approval from the Department of Finance and Administration. The Department of Finance and Administration shall not provide written approval to escalate any funds for salaries and/or headcounts without proof of availability of new or additional funds above the appropriated level. Unless specifically noted, all Fiscal Year 2025 escalated headcounts have been accounted for and shall be converted to authorized time-limited headcounts. No general funds authorized to be expended herein shall be used to replace federal funds and/or other special funds used for salaries authorized under the provisions of this act and which are withdrawn and no longer available. None of the funds herein appropriated shall be used in violation of the Internal Revenue Services Publication 15-A relating to the reporting of income paid to contract employees, as interpreted by the Office of the State Auditor. If the agencys total authorized headcount decreases from Fiscal Year 2025 to Fiscal Year 2026, it will be the agencys discretion as to what headcounts are removed. The Legislature authorized four (4) new headcounts, which are included in the authorized headcount above for Fiscal Year 2026. New Headcount Titles Authorized: Medical Examiner for North MS Office  Medical                       Examiner - 1 Pathology Assistant for North MS Office   Forensic                   Laboratory - 1 Sexual Assault Kits Personnel -  Forensic Laboratory - 2 SECTION 4.  The Commissioner of Public Safety may, on a case-by-case basis, within funds available, recommend that corrective salary adjustments be made to the compensation of employees of the Department of Public Safety where an inequity was created between employees of equivalent capacity by previous application of the agency appropriation acts.  Any such corrective salary adjustment plan must have prior approval by the State Personnel Board.  Such adjustments will not be retroactive. Any funds in the Salary, Wages and Fringe Benefits major object of expenditure may be used to purchase accumulated compensatory time within funds available. SECTION 5.  It is the intention of the Legislature, that the Department of Public Safety shall receive Five Million Dollars ($5,000,000.00) from the Mississippi Department of Transportation, for the operations of the Office of Commercial Transportation Enforcement Division that is authorized in Section 77-7-330, Mississippi Code of 1972. SECTION 6.  It is the intent of the Legislature that the local governments pay for part of the computer cost of the Mississippi Justice Information Center by maintaining their contribution to the Department of Public Safety. SECTION 7.  It is the intention of the Legislature that the Department of Public Safety designate certain employees to aid the Office of Forensics Laboratories in the billing and collecting of all fees charged for services rendered by the Office of Forensics Laboratories. SECTION 8.  No part of the funds appropriated herein shall be transferred to, expended by, or used, directly or indirectly, for the benefit of any public relations, publicity or publication activities of any other state agency, department or officer, nor shall any personnel paid with funds appropriated herein be transferred or assigned to any other state agency, department or officer for public relations, publicity, or publication activities of such office. SECTION 9.  It is the intention of the Legislature that the Department of Public Safety shall not issue citations for violations of speed limits on a quota basis.  No funds expended under this act shall be used for such quota-based citations for violations of speed limits. SECTION 10.  In compliance with the "Mississippi Performance Budget and Strategic Planning Act of 1994," it is the intent of the Legislature that the funds provided herein shall be utilized in the most efficient and effective manner possible to achieve the intended mission of this agency.  Based on the funding authorized, this agency shall make every effort to attain the targeted performance measures provided below: FY2026 Performance Measures                                       Target Enforcement Percent Increased in Enforcement Citations               7.00 Percent Decrease in Fatalities                          4.00 Percent Increase in DUI Arrests (Includes Felony DUI)                              5.00 Number of Criminal Investigations                     68,000 Number of Highway Fatalities per 100 Million Vehicle Miles of Travel                    0.90 Number of Alcohol Impaired Driving Fatalities per 100,000 Population                  1.60 Number of Driving Under the Influence (DUI) Arrests per 100,000 Population              230.00 Percentage Increase in Seatbelt/Child Restraint Citations                                7.00 Driver Service Number of Driver's License/ID Cards Issued            654,861 Cost per License Document Produced                     24.00 Number of Drivers Suspended                           24,300 Number of Accident Reports Processed                   1,430 Average Wait Time (Minutes)                            20.00 Number of Complaints (Documented)                         24 Percent Change in Wait Time                            -5.00 Percent Change in Complaints                            1.10 Percent Increase in Regular and Commercial Driver Licenses Issued                 10.00 Support Services Number of Financial Transactions Processed             45,402 Number of Employees Supported                          1,776 Forensic Analysis Number of Reports Issued (Cases)                      19,540 Number of Court Testimonies (Cases)                      200 Cost per Case Analyzed                                940.00 Cost per Testimony                                    550.00 Percent of Days for Reports Issued                     45.00 Dna Analysis Number of Known Felony Offender Samples in Database                                     159,000 Number of Proficiency Samples                            800 Number of Casework Samples Examined                   12,500 Cost per Sample                                       750.00 Maintain the Integrity of the CODIS Database            99.00 Forensic Pathology Number of Deaths Investigated                         29,250 Number of Autopsies Performed SME Office                1,400 Cost per Autopsy Performed                          1,600.00 Percent Change in the Number of Deaths Investigated                                       3.00 Percent of Coroners Educated by ME's Office            100.00 Percent Change in the Number of Autopsies Performed at SME Office                  5.00 Training Academy Number of Basic Students to Graduate                     225 Number of Basic Refresher Students to Graduate                                            15 Number of In-Service and Advanced Students to Graduate                              1,400 Percent of Law Enforcement Officers Trained            100.00 Drug Enforcement Number of Drug Suspects Arrested                       1,300 Number of Drug Cases Prosecuted                          600 Number of Drug Organization Disrupted and/or Dismantled                                     4 Percent Change in Number of Drug Suspects Arrested                                  1.00 Percent Change in Number of Drug Cases Prosecuted                                         1.00 Percent Change in Number of Drug Organization Disrupted and/or Dismantled            1.00 Jail Officer Training Number of Jail and Youth Detention Officers Certified                                  350 Number of Certification Transactions                   1,500 Number of Administrative Review Actions                   15 Percent of Appointed Jail and Youth Detention Officers Obtaining Certification                                     80.00 Percent of Administrative Review Actions Taken Within One Year                              1.00 Law Enforcement Training Number of Basic Law Enforcement Officers Certified                                          354 Number of Certification Transactions                   2,534 Number of Training Quality Monitoring                  1,030 Percent of Appointed Law Enforcement Officers Obtaining Certification                  75.00 Percent of Appointed Part-Time, Reserve, and Auxiliary Officers Obtaining Certification                                     80.00 Percent of Administrative Disciplinary Actions Taken Within One Year                      3.00 Highway Safety Number of Federal Applications Funded and Statewide Pgms Supported                         10 Percent Decrease in the Number of Unrestrained Passenger Vehicle Occupant Fatalities by 5%                                   2.00 Percent Decrease in the Number of Fatalities in Crashes Involving a Driver or Motorcycle Operator with a BAC of .08 and above                                      1.00 Justice Number of Juvenile Jail/Detention Alternatives                                         3 Number of Hot Spots Policing Programs Funded                4 Emerg Telecommunications Tng Number of Emergency Telecommunicators Certified                                          400 Number of Certification Transactions                   3,000 Percent of Appointed Emergency Telecommunicators Obtaining Certification                                     75.00 Percent of Appointed Emergency Telecommunicators Obtaining Recertification                                   75.00 Percent of Administrative Review Actions Taken Within One Year                              1.00 Council On Aging Number of Triad Programs Established                       2 Number of Training Programs Conducted                      0 Provide On-Site-Training                                   0 Percent Change in the Number of Operational Triad Programs                         3.00 Percent Increase in Funding to Counties to Educate Senior Citizens                         0.00 Juvenile Facility Monitoring Unit Number of Facilities Inspected                            80 Number of Strategic Plans Implemented                     20 Percent of Admin Review Actions Taken Within One Year                                   85.00 Homeland Security Number of OHS Grants for Jurisdictions                   325 Number of First Responder Classes                        210 Percent Increase in Emergency Task Force Responder Training and Exercises                   5.00 Percent Increase in Citizen and Community Preparedness Training and Exercises                                         10.00 Percent Increase in Requests for Information             3.08 Percent Increase in National Incident Management Training and Exercises                  1.49 Investigations Number of Human Trafficking Cases Initiated               172 Number of Human Trafficking Arrests                       41 Number of Human Trafficking Child Recoveries               20 Capitol Police Number of Patrols                                         80 Number of Emergencies (Medical, Weather, Active Shooter, etc.)                             6,000 Average Time to Respond to an Emergency (Minutes)                                          5.00 Motor Carrier Number of Compliance Reviews                         160,000 Number of On-site Examinations at Scales               30,000 Number of Trucks Weighed                           6,000,000 A reporting of the degree to which the performance targets set above have been or are being achieved shall be provided in the agency's budget request submitted to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee for Fiscal Year 2027. SECTION 11.  It is the intention of the Legislature that all divisions within the Mississippi Department of Public Safety shall maintain complete accounting and personnel records related to the expenditure of all funds appropriated under this act and that such records shall be in the same format and level of detail as maintained for Fiscal Year 2025.  It is further the intention of the Legislature that the agency's budget request for Fiscal Year 2027 shall be submitted to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee in a format and level of detail comparable to the format and level of detail provided during the Fiscal Year 2026 budget request process. SECTION 12.  Of the funds appropriated under the provisions of Section 2 of this act, funds may be expended to defray the costs of clothing for sworn nonuniform law enforcement officers in an amount not to exceed One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) annually per officer. SECTION 13.  It is the intention of the Legislature that whenever two (2) or more bids are received by this agency for the purchase of commodities or equipment, and whenever all things stated in such received bids are equal with respect to price, quality and service, the Mississippi Industries for the Blind shall be given preference.  A similar preference shall be given to the Mississippi Industries for the Blind whenever purchases are made without competitive bids. SECTION 14.  The department is authorized to expend available funds on technology or equipment upgrades or replacements when it will generate savings through efficiency or when the savings generated from such upgrades or replacements exceed expenditures thereof. SECTION 15.  Of the funds provided herein, and in addition to the One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) authorized in Section 45-3-7, Mississippi Code of 1972, Department of Public Safety Officers who are licensed commercial pilots shall receive an additional Nine Hundred Dollars ($900.00), for a total of One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00), additional compensation for such service. SECTION 16.  It is the intention of the Legislature that the Department of Public Safety shall provide an annual report to the Mississippi Legislature detailing any elected official or any other person who is not an employee of the Department of Public Safety who was transported in Highway Patrol aircraft during the fiscal year.  The report shall be provided to each member of the Mississippi Legislature on or before January 15, 2026. SECTION 17.  The Commissioner of Public Safety shall have the authority to transfer any funds from any division within the Department of Public Safety to any other division of the Department of Public Safety Special Funds, including, but not limited to, Funds 3711, 371C, 371E, 3713, 3714, 3715, 3740, 3741, 3742, 3744, 3747 and 3718, not to exceed Twenty Million Dollars ($20,000,000.00) collectively during Fiscal Year 2026.  However, none of the funds appropriated by this act shall be expended unless the Department of Public Safety provides prior written notification of any transfer of funds provided in this section. SECTION 18.  The Bureau of Narcotics is authorized to expend a sum, not to exceed Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($500,000.00) from account No. 3371800000, for purposes of effectuating the provisions of Section 41-29-179, Mississippi Code of 1972, Section 1 of this act.  Expenditures authorized by this section may include, but not be limited to, costs associated with contracting with one or more vendors, contractors or other persons or entities to create, operate and maintain the forfeiture website and to provide continuing support in relation thereto.  In the event an amount less than Five Hundred Thousand ($500,000.00) is required to effectuate the purposes of this section, the Bureau is authorized to expend the remainder of such authorized funds for the purchase of commodities, vehicles and/or other equipment necessary in the furtherance of the needs of the Bureau. SECTION 19.  Of the funds appropriated in Section 1 of this act, it is the intention of the Legislature that Four Million Three Hundred Twelve Thousand Six Hundred Two Dollars ($4,312,602.00) may be allocated for the programs supported from General Fund court assessments as follows: State Crime Stoppers Fund................. $ 99,003.00. Adult Driver Training..................... $ 75,794.00. Information Exchange Network Fund.......... $ 264,007.00. Forensics Laboratory of MS  Implied Consent Law Fund..................... $     404,795.00. Forensics Laboratory of MS  DNA Identification Fund.................. $     629,543.00. Law Enforcement and Firefighters Death Benefits Trust Fund.................. $     191,361.00. Law Enforcement Standards Training  Law Enforcement Officers Training Fund.... $   2,276,404.00. Drug Abuse/Driver's License Reinstatement.. $ 13,573.00. Federal  State Alcohol Program Fund....... $ 160,431.00. MS Leadership Council on Aging Fund........ $ 197,691.00. SECTION 20.  It is the intention of the Legislature that the Mississippi Bureau of Narcotics, Mississippi Department of Public Safety, shall have the authority to receive, budget and expend special funds from the Drug Evidence Disposition Funds (3372000000), not to exceed Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($500,000.00). SECTION 21.  Of the funds appropriated by this act, pursuant to Section 97-3-54.9, Mississippi Code of 1972, Two Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars ($250,000.00) is provided for the duties and operations of a Statewide Human Trafficking Coordinator and a data analyst within the Bureau of Investigation in the Department of Public Safety, who shall coordinate all statewide activities and work with the Department of Child Protection Services for all victims recovered. SECTION 22.  Of the funds appropriated by this act, pursuant to Section 45-1-2(7), Mississippi Code of 1972, Two Hundred Forty-two Thousand Six Hundred Three Dollars ($242,603.00) is provided for the duties and operations associated with the Mississippi School Safety Act of 2019. SECTION 23.  The department may subgrant a portion of the funds appropriated herein to the Jackson Police Department for eligible activities contingent upon the execution of an operational agreement between the Capitol Police and Jackson Police Department on roles and responsibilities within the Capitol Complex Improvement District. SECTION 24.  Of the funds appropriated in Section 1 of this act, Nine Hundred Thousand Dollars ($900,000.00) is provided to the Capitol Police for the purpose of defraying expenses related to the housing of detainees arrested within the Capital Complex Improvement District. SECTION 25.  The following sum, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is re-appropriated out of any money in the Capital Expense Fund not otherwise appropriated to the Department of Public Safety for the purpose of reauthorizing the expenditure of Capital Expense Funds, as authorized in Senate Bill No. 3020, 2024 Regular Session, to the Department of Public Safety for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025 and ending June 30, 2026........................................ .............................................. $ 6,063,879.00. This reappropriation is for the following purposes: (a)  Vehicles for Capitol Police............. $ 1,465,604.00. (b)  R&R to Facilities at MS Law Enforcement Officers' Training Academy......................................... $ 96,691.00. (c)  Driver Service Bureau: i.  For maintenance and equipment related to the IDEMIA System under Section 63-1-16, Mississippi Code of 1972 .......................................... $ 160,037.00. ii.  For upgrades to the Driver Service IDEMIA System..................................... $ 3,871,776.00. (d)  Driver Service Bureau-Canton Building... $ 161,671.00. (e) Purchase of Forensics Lab Equipment..................................$ 308,100.00. Notwithstanding the amount reappropriated under this section, the amount that may be expended under the authority of this section shall not exceed the unexpended balance of the funds remaining as of June 30, 2025, from the amount authorized for the previous fiscal year. In addition, this reappropriation shall not change the purpose for which the funds were originally authorized. SECTION 26.  Of the funds appropriated in Section 2, Two Million Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($2,500,000.00) or so much thereof as may be necessary, shall be derived out of any money in the State Treasury to the credit of the Capital Expense Fund, as created in Section 27-103-303, Mississippi Code of 1972, and allocated in a manner as determined by the Treasurer's Office. These funds are provided to address the Forensics case backlogs. SECTION 27.  Of the funds appropriated in Section 2, Five Hundred Eighty-seven Thousand Dollars ($587,000.00) or so much thereof as may be necessary, shall be derived out of any money in the State Treasury to the credit of the Capital Expense Fund, as created in Section 27-103-303, Mississippi Code of 1972, and allocated in a manner as determined by the Treasurer's Office. These funds are provided for furniture and parking lots for the agency's new headquarters building. SECTION 28.  Of the funds appropriated in Section 2, Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00) or so much thereof as may be necessary, shall be derived out of any money in the State Treasury to the credit of the Capital Expense Fund, as created in Section 27-103-303, Mississippi Code of 1972, and allocated in a manner as determined by the Treasurer's Office. These funds are provided for the purchase of bulletproof vests for local law enforcement officers. SECTION 29.  Of the funds appropriated in Section 2, Three Million Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($3,500,000.00) or so much thereof as may be necessary, shall be derived out of any money in the State Treasury to the credit of the Capital Expense Fund, as created in Section 27-103-303, Mississippi Code of 1972, and allocated in a manner as determined by the Treasurer's Office. These funds are provided for the Driver Service Bureau to replace the driver license system. SECTION 30.  Of the funds appropriated in Section 2, One Million One Hundred Thousand Dollars ($1,100,000.00) or so much thereof as may be necessary, shall be derived out of any money in the State Treasury to the credit of the Capital Expense Fund, as created in Section 27-103-303, Mississippi Code of 1972, and allocated in a manner as determined by the Treasurer's Office. These funds are provided for a Capitol Security Platform. SECTION 31.  Of the funds appropriated in Section 2, One Million Two Hundred Sixty Thousand Dollars ($1,260,000.00) or so much thereof as may be necessary, shall be derived out of any money in the State Treasury to the credit of the Capital Expense Fund, as created in Section 27-103-303, Mississippi Code of 1972, and allocated in a manner as determined by the Treasurer's Office. These funds are provided for the Driver Service Bureau Canton building lease. SECTION 32.  With the funds appropriated herein, the Department of Public Safety is authorized to make payments to certain vendors for expenses incurred during Fiscal Years 2021 through 2024 in the following total amount................................... $ 294,862.00. SECTION 33.  The money herein appropriated shall be paid by the State Treasurer out of any money in the State Treasury to the credit of the proper fund or funds as set forth in this act, upon warrants issued by the State Fiscal Officer; and the State Fiscal Officer shall issue his warrants upon requisitions signed by the proper person, officer or officers, in the manner provided by law. SECTION 34.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2025.